Utah, session 2026, SB250.
Section 1. Section 73-32-304 is amended to read:73-32-304. Great Salt Lake Account.(1)As used in this section ;:(a)"Mineral" includes a chemical compound that includes an element or mineral.(b)"Mining" means the process of producing, extracting, leaching, evaporating, or otherwise removing a mineral from a natural deposit of the mineral.(2)(a)There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Great Salt Lake Account" consisting of:(i)revenues deposited into the account under Subsection (3);(ii)appropriations from the Legislature; and(iii)interest and other earnings described in Subsection (2)(b).(b)The Office of the Treasurer shall deposit interest and other earnings derived from investment of money in the account into the account.(3)The Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands shall deposit into the account the royalty income received by the state from mining that occurs on or after July 1, 2022, of a mineral from the sovereign lands of the Great Salt Lake if during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2020, the state did not receive royalty income from the mining of that same mineral from the sovereign lands of the Great Salt Lake.(4)(a)Upon appropriation by the Legislature, money in the account may be used to:(a)(i)manage the water levels of the Great Salt Lake; andor(b)fund the activities of the commissioner and office under this chapter.(ii)make payments to negotiate agreements, leases, or other means to acquire or lease water or water rights for the Great Salt Lake.(b)Money deposited into the account under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) or appropriations transferring money from the Water Infrastructure Restricted Account may only be used for the purpose outlined in Subsection (4)(a)(ii).

Section 2:
Section 2.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 2(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.NATURAL RESOURCES, AGRICULTURE, AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITYDEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCESITEM 1Department of Natural Resources - Office of the Great Salt Lake CommissionerFrom General Fund1,500,000GSL Commissioner Administration1,500,000Subsection 2(b).Restricted Fund and Account TransfersThe Legislature authorizes the State Division of Finance to transfer the following amounts between the following funds or accounts as indicated. Expenditures and outlays from the funds to which the money is transferred must be authorized by an appropriation.NATURAL RESOURCES, AGRICULTURE, AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITYITEM 2General Fund Restricted - Great Salt Lake AccountFrom General Fund(1,500,000)From Water Infrastructure Restricted Account, One-time200,000,000Great Salt Lake Account198,500,000The Legislature intends that the money transferred from the Water Infrastructure Restricted Account under this Item 2 be used for the acquisition or lease of water or water rights for the Great Salt Lake as provided in Subsection 73-32-304(4)(a)(ii).

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.